Utah statutes.
4-29-1.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules.
The department is authorized, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as it considers
necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.
